Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202686-1804
Conversational artificial intelligence service; disclosure required, when.

If a reasonable person interacting with a conversational artificial intelligence service would be misled to believe that the person is interacting with a human, an operator shall clearly and conspicuously disclose that the conversational artificial intelligence service is artificial intelligence.

Laws 2026, LB525, § 15.
July 1, 2027